Maine, session 132, LD2124.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §4641-B, sub-§4-B, ¶E-4 is enacted to read:
E-4. Notwithstanding paragraphs E-1 and E-2, the State Controller shall first credit
$1,012,617 in fiscal year 2026-27 of the revenues available to the Maine State Housing
Authority under paragraph E-2, subparagraph (2), division (c) for the Housing
Production Fund established in Title 30-A, section 4773 to the Maine State Housing
Authority, which shall deposit the funds in the authority's shelter operating subsidy
program to support emergency homeless shelters in the State.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Housing Production Fund N557
Initiative: Reduces allocations to reflect a one-time decrease in revenue from shifting 2%
of real estate transfer tax revenue from the Housing Production Fund program to the Maine
State Housing Authority to be used for the shelter operating subsidy program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($1,012,617)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($1,012,617)
Shelter Operating Subsidy 0661
Initiative: Provides a one-time allocation to support emergency homeless shelters in the
State through the authority's shelter operating subsidy program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,012,617
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $1,012,617
Page 1 - 132LR2746(09)

HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $0
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $0
Sec. 3. Effective date. This Act takes effect September 1, 2026.
Page 2 - 132LR2746(09)